lexc/verb/enhuigeszt.lexc
!!!enhuige.lexc!!!

Multichar_Symbols  +Verb[gcat] +Rep +Imper +Pot
                   +Inf +Inf11 +Inf12 +Inf13 +Inf21 +Inf22 +Inf23 +Pref+  +Adv +Advan 
                  +IndefSg1   +IndefSg2   +IndefSg3   +IndefSg12
                  +IndefPl1 +IndefPl2 +IndefPl3
                  +DefSg1   +DefSg2   +DefSg3  
                  +DefPl1 +DefPl2 +DefPl3
                  +ConjDefSg12 +PastDefSg12  +CondDefSg12
                  +ConjIndefSg1   +ConjIndefSg2   +ConjIndefSg3   
                  +ConjIndefPl1 +ConjIndefPl2 +ConjIndefPl3
                  +ConjDefSg1   +ConjDefSg2[lfea]   +ConjDefSg3  
                  +ConjDefPl1 +ConjDefPl2 +ConjDefPl3
                  +PastIndefSg1   +PastIndefSg2   +PastIndefSg3   
                  +PastIndefPl1 +PastIndefPl2 +PastIndefPl3
                  +PastDefSg1   +PastDefSg2   +PastDefSg3  
                  +PastDefPl1 +PastDefPl2 +PastDefPl3
                  +CondIndefSg1   +CondIndefSg2   +CondIndefSg3   
                  +CondIndefPl1 +CondIndefPl2 +CondIndefPl3
                  +CondDefSg1   +CondDefSg2   +CondDefSg3  
                  +CondDefPl1 +CondDefPl2 +CondDefPl3
      
§AA§ §AAA§ §igea§ §igeo§ §igeo2§ §igeu§ §igeuo§
§igejakik1§ §igejatokitek1§ §igeija1§ §igeaa§ §igetattet§
§j§ §szorelol§  §sj§ §l§ 
§igeoo§

LEXICON Root
Verb;
Verb1;
Verb2;
Prefigekoto;
Prefigekoto2;

LEXICON Prefigekoto
+Pref+:keresztül   Verb;
+Pref+:kölcsön   Verb;
+Pref+:széjjel   Verb;
+Pref+:szembe   Verb;
+Pref+:szerte   Verb;
+Pref+:vissza   Verb;
+Pref+:helyre   Verb;
+Pref+:tovább   Verb;
+Pref+:tönkre   Verb;
+Pref+:észre   Verb;
+Pref+:rajta   Verb;
+Pref+:előre   Verb;
+Pref+:félbe   Verb;
+Pref+:félre   Verb;
+Pref+:felül   Verb;
+Pref+:fölül   Verb;
+Pref+:agyon   Verb;
+Pref+:ellen   Verb;
+Pref+:körbe   Verb;
+Pref+:körül   Verb;
+Pref+:közbe   Verb;
+Pref+:közre   Verb;
+Pref+:külön   Verb;
+Pref+:utána   Verb;
+Pref+:végbe   Verb;
+Pref+:végig   Verb;
+Pref+:hátra   Verb;
+Pref+:hozzá   Verb;
+Pref+:egybe   Verb;
+Pref+:ketté   Verb;
+Pref+:össze   Verb;
+Pref+:mellé   Verb;
+Pref+:által   Verb;
+Pref+:alul   Verb;
+Pref+:haza   Verb;
+Pref+:újra   Verb;
+Pref+:abba   Verb;
+Pref+:neki   Verb;
+Pref+:bele   Verb;
+Pref+:újjá   Verb;
+Pref+:benn   Verb;
+Pref+:fenn   Verb;
+Pref+:fönn   Verb;
+Pref+:jóvá   Verb;
+Pref+:szét   Verb;
+Pref+:tele   Verb;
+Pref+:tova   Verb;
+Pref+:meg   Verb;
+Pref+:oda   Verb;
+Pref+:elő   Verb;
+Pref+:túl   Verb;
+Pref+:alá   Verb;
+Pref+:föl   Verb;
+Pref+:ide   Verb;
+Pref+:fel   Verb;
+Pref+:rá   Verb;
+Pref+:ki   Verb;
+Pref+:le   Verb;
+Pref+:el   Verb;
+Pref+:át   Verb;
+Pref+:be   Verb;

LEXICON Prefigekoto2
+Pref+:hátra   Verb2;
+Pref+:meg   Verb2;
+Pref+:oda   Verb2;
+Pref+:túl   Verb2;
+Pref+:ki   Verb2;
+Pref+:le   Verb2;
+Pref+:el   Verb2;
+Pref+:be   Verb2;

LEXICON Verb
hisz AddVerbhisz;
hisz:hi AddVerbhisz7;
hisz:higgy AddVerbhisz3;
hisz:hí AddVerbhiszadv;
jön-megy AddVerbmegy;
jön-megy:jön-me AddVerbmegy7;
jön-megy:jön-men AddVerbmegy3;
jön-megy:jön-mé AddVerbmegy9;
megy AddVerbmegy;
megy:me AddVerbmegy7;
megy:men AddVerbmegy3;
megy:mé AddVerbmegy9;
tesz AddVerbhisz;
tesz:te AddVerbhisz7;
tesz:tegy AddVerbtesz3;
tesz:té AddVerbtesz7;
vesz AddVerbhisz;
vesz:ve AddVerbhisz7;
vesz:vegy AddVerbtesz3;
vesz:vé AddVerbtesz7;
visz AddVerbhisz;
visz:vi AddVerbhisz7;
visz:vigy AddVerbvisz3;
visz:ví AddVerbhisz71;

LEXICON Verb2
lesz AddVerbhisz;
lesz:le AddVerblesz7;
lesz:legy AddVerblesz33;
lesz:legy AddVerblesz3;
lesz:légy AddVerblesz9;
nincs AddVerbnincs;
sincs AddVerbnincs;
van AddVerbvan;
van:le AddVerbvan9;
van:legy AddVerblesz33;
van:leh AddVerbvan3;
van:lé AddVerbvan13;
van:légy AddVerbvan11;
van:vagy AddVerbvan5;
van:val AddVerbvan71;
van:vol AddVerbvan7;


!ír
!írhat  potential
!irathat imper potential
!irat imper
!irattattat imper imper
!irjon command
!írhasson
!írogattathat rep imper pot
!íratgathat
!írogattatgat
!Irni
!írnék, írnál .. írnának cond conditional
! írjak írjon írj  command

!hisz
LEXICON AddVerbhisz
[stem]+Verb[gcat]:0     Rephisz;

LEXICON Rephisz
+Rep:^+cRep^§igea§g§AA§t  Imperhisz;   ! hiszeget
                    Nrep1hisz;          

LEXICON Imperhisz
+Advan:^+ccAdvan^v§igeaa§n #;
+Adv:^+cAdv^v§AA§  #;
+Imper:^+cImp^t§AA§t  Nrephisz;
                      Nrephisz2;

LEXICON Nrephisz
+Inf11:^+ccInf11^n§igeo§m #;
+Inf12:^+ccInf12^n§igeo§d #;
+Inf13:^+ccInf13^ni§AA§ #;
+Inf21:^+ccInf21^n§igeu§nk #;
+Inf22:^+ccInf22^n§igeo§t§igeo§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^ni§igeu§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^ni§igeuo§k #;
+Inf:^+cInf^ni  #;
+Advan:^+ccAdvan^v§igeaa§n #;
+Adv:^+cAdv^v§AA§  #;
+Rep:^+cNrep^g§AA§t  NImperhisz;
                      NImperhisz2;
LEXICON Nrephisz2
+Rep:^+cNrep^g§AA§t  NImperhisz;
                      NImperhisz2;

LEXICON Nrep1hisz
+Rep:^+cNrep^§igea§g§AA§t  NImperhisz;  !hiszeget
                      Case1hisz;

LEXICON NImperhisz
+Inf11:^+ccInf11^n§igeo§m #;
+Inf12:^+ccInf12^n§igeo§d #;
+Inf13:^+ccInf13^ni§AA§ #;
+Inf21:^+ccInf21^n§igeu§nk #;
+Inf22:^+ccInf22^n§igeo§t§igeo§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^ni§igeu§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^ni§igeuo§k #;
+Inf:^+cInf^ni  #;
+Advan:^+ccAdvan^v§igeaa§n #;
+Adv:^+cAdv^v§AA§  #;
+Imper:^+cImp^t§AA§t  Pothisz;
                      Pothisz2;
LEXICON NImperhisz2
+Imper:^+cImp^t§AA§t  Pothisz;
                      Pothisz2;

LEXICON Pothisz
+Inf11:^+ccInf11^n§igeo§m #;
+Inf12:^+ccInf12^n§igeo§d #;
+Inf13:^+ccInf13^ni§AA§ #;
+Inf21:^+ccInf21^n§igeu§nk #;
+Inf22:^+ccInf22^n§igeo§t§igeo§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^ni§igeu§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^ni§igeuo§k #;
+Inf:^+cInf^ni  #;
+Advan:^+ccAdvan^v§igeaa§n #;
+Adv:^+cAdv^v§AA§  #;
+Pot:^+cPot^h§AAA§t  AddInfhisz;
             Casehisz;
LEXICON Pothisz2
+Pot:^+cPot^h§AAA§t  AddInfhisz;
             Casehisz;
LEXICON AddInfhisz
+Inf11:^+ccInf11^n§igeo§m #;
+Inf12:^+ccInf12^n§igeo§d #;
+Inf13:^+ccInf13^ni§AA§ #;
+Inf21:^+ccInf21^n§igeu§nk #;
+Inf22:^+ccInf22^n§igeo§t§igeo§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^ni§igeu§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^ni§igeuo§k #;
+Inf:^+cInf^ni  #;
+Advan:^+ccAdvan^v§igeaa§n #;
+Adv:^+cAdv^v§AA§  #;
               Casehisz;

LEXICON Verb1
arrébbvisz AddVerbhisz;
jóvátesz AddVerbhisz;
kijjebbvisz AddVerbhisz;
közzétesz AddVerbhisz;
közétesz AddVerbhisz;
lejjebbvisz AddVerbhisz;
odébbvisz AddVerbhisz;
szemrevesz AddVerbhisz;
szemügyrevesz AddVerbhisz;
számbavesz AddVerbhisz;
telitesz AddVerbhisz;
tönkretesz AddVerbhisz;
véghezvisz AddVerbhisz;
észrevesz AddVerbhisz;
